Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.420

Model contingency plan for pollution control facilities and hazardous waste management.

(1) The department, in consultation with appropriate federal agencies, the departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and ecology, representatives of local government, and any other person the director may deem appropriate, shall assist in the development of a model contingency plan, consistent with other plans required for hazardous materials by federal and state law, to serve as a draft plan for local governments which may be incorporated into the state and local emergency management plans.

(2) The model contingency plan shall:

(a) Include specific recommendations for pollution control facilities which are deemed to be most appropriate for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal, and recycling of oil and other spilled material and furthering the prevention and mitigation of such pollution;

(b) Include recommendations for the training of local personnel consistent with other training proposed, funded, or required by federal or state laws for hazardous materials;

(c) Suggest cooperative training exercises between the public and private sector consistent with other training proposed, funded, or required by federal or state laws for hazardous materials;

(d) Identify federal and state laws requiring contingency or management plans applicable or related to prevention of pollution, emergency response capabilities, and hazardous waste management, together with a list of funding sources that local governments may use in development of their specific plans;

(e) Promote formal agreements between the department and local entities for effective spill response; and

(f) Develop policies and procedures for the augmentation of emergency services and agency spill response personnel through the use of volunteers: PROVIDED, That no contingency plan may require the use of volunteers by a responding responsible party without that party's consent.

[ 1997 c 49 s 6; 1995 c 391 s 4; 1994 c 264 s 11; 1988 c 36 s 11; 1987 c 479 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 391: See note following RCW 38.52.005.